Hawaii statutes.
[§159-16] Granting, suspending and revoking
licenses. (a) The action of the board in refusing to grant or renew a
license, or in revoking or suspending a license, may be judicially reviewed in
the manner provided by chapter 91.

(b) No license shall be denied unless the
board finds after due notice and an opportunity of hearing in accordance with
chapter 91, to the applicant any of the following:

(1) That the applicant does not qualify or possess
the facilities to conduct a business properly.

(2) That the applicant does not have the financial
responsibility to conduct a business properly.

(3) That the issuance of a license is otherwise not
in the public interest.

(c) The board may refuse to renew a license or
may suspend or revoke a license upon due notice and opportunity of hearing in
accordance with chapter 91, to the licensee when it finds any of the following:

(1) The licensee has been adjudged a bankrupt.

(2) The licensee has violated chapter 480 and the
violation is directly or indirectly involved with the state meat industry.

(3) The licensee has failed to keep records or to
furnish the statements or information required by the board.

(4) The licensee has intentionally made a false or
misleading statement upon which the license was issued.

(5) The licensee has violated or failed to comply
with this chapter.

(6) The licensee has ceased to operate the business
for which the license was issued.

(d) The board may conditionally renew a
license or may conditionally decline to suspend or revoke a license, but the
condition shall have appropriate relation to the administration of this
chapter. [L 1969, c 214, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next